en: Crêpes with rum
fr: Crêpes au rhum

en: Filled crêpes
de: Gefüllte Crêpes, Crêpes mit Füllung
fi: täytetyt letut
fr: Crêpes fourrées
hr: Punjene palačinke
it: Crepes ripiene
nl: Gevulde pannenknoeken

en: Sweet filled crêpes, Sugary filled crêpes
fr: Crêpes fourrées sucrées
hr: Slatke punjene palačinke
nl: Zoete gevulde pannenkoeken

en: Crepes filled with sugar
fr: Crêpes fourrées au sucre

en: Plain buckwheat crepes
fr: Galettes de blé noir, galette de blé noir, galette de sarazin, galettes de sarrasin, galette de sarrasin, galettes de sarazin, crêpe au sarrasin
hr: Obične palačinke od heljde
it: Crespelle al grano saraceno

en: Savoury filled crêpes, Salty filled crêpes
fr: Crêpes fourrées salées
hr: Slanim punjenim palačinkama
nl: Hartige gevulde pannenkoeken

en: Filled crêpes with chocolate, Home-made crepes filled with chocolate spread, Prepacked Crepes filled with chocolate
de: Crêpes gefüllt mit Schokolade
fr: Crêpes fourrées au chocolat, Crêpes au chocolat, Crêpes maison fourrées au chocolat, Crêpes préemballées fourrées au chocolat
hr: Punjene palačinke s čokoladom
nl: Pannenkoeken gevuld met chocola

en: Crepes filled with chocolate and hazelnut spread
fr: Crêpes fourrées à la pâte à tartiner chocolat et noisettes, Crêpes chocolat noisettes, Crêpes choco-noisettes

en: Filled crêpes with jam, Home-made crepes filled with jam
fr: Crêpes fourrées à la confiture, Crêpes maison fourrées à la confiture, Crêpes à la confiture
hr: Punjene palačinke džemom
nl: Pannenkoeken gevuld met jam

en: Crepe filled with strawberries
de: Crêpes mit Erdbeeren gefüllt
es: Crepe relleno de fresas
fr: Crêpes fourrées aux fraises
hr: Palačinka punjena jagodama
it: Crepe ripiene di fragole
nl: Gevulde pannenkoeken met aardbeien

en: Frozen crêpes and pancakes, Frozen crêpes and galettes
fr: Crêpes et galettes surgelées

en: Fish and meat and eggs, Fish meat eggs
bg: Риба - месо и яйца
ca: Peix carn i ous
de: Fisch und Fleisch und Eier, Fisch Fleisch Eier
es: Pescado carne y huevos
fi: Kala liha ja munat
fr: Poissons et viandes et oeufs, Poissons viandes oeufs
he: דגים ובשר וביצים
hr: Riba i meso i jaja
hu: Hal és hús és a tojás
it: Pesce e carne e uova
nl: Vis vlees en eieren
pt: Peixes e carnes e ovos
ru: Рыба - мясо и яйца
zh: 鱼类、肉类和蛋类

en: Offals
de: Innereien
fr: Abats
hr: Iznutrice
in: Ingewanden
it: Frattaglie, Interiora
ja: もつ
nl: Orgaanvlezen, Orgaanvlees, Slachtafval

en: guts
fr: boyau, boyaux

en: Ears
fr: Oreilles, oreille

en: Feet, foot
fr: Pieds, pied

en: Cooked offal
fr: Abats cuits

en: Offals Soup
fr: Soupe d'abats

en: Frozen offals Soup
fr: Soupe d'abats surgelés

en: Cooked kidneys, Cooked kidney
fr: Rognons cuits, Rognon cuit